data/sources/glossaries/co/raw/apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="d/à__vblex">
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parla/lli"/></e>

      <e><p><l>endu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>endu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parla/lli"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ò</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ava</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avamu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avanu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>avani</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>at</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>

      <e><p><l>endu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="piac/e__vblex">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ia</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>erà</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>eranu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>eria</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iut</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/ette__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ette</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ette</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ettendu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ettu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>etti</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ette</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ittemu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ittite</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ettenu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>etti</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>etti</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>etti</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ettimu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ettite</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ettinu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>etterà</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>etteria</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>essu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>essa</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>essi</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esse</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/uccà__vblex">
      <e><p><l>uccà</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ucca</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parla/lli"/></e>

      <e><p><l>occa</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uccherà</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uccheria</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>occ</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uccat</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fid/ià__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ià</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>èndu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eghju</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eghji</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eghja</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iemu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iate</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eghjanu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="circ/à__vblex">
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parla/lli"/></e>
      <e><p><l>hendu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hendu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>u</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hemu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>hi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>himu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hite</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hinu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ò</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>arà</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ava</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ave</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ava</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avamu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avete</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avanu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>atu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ata</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ati</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="dà"><i>d</i><par n="d/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stà"><i>st</i><par n="d/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fidià"><i>fid</i><par n="fid/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tuccà"><i>t</i><par n="t/uccà__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="piace"><i>piac</i><par n="piac/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dispiace"><i>dispiac</i><par n="piac/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mette"><i>m</i><par n="m/ette__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trasmette"><i>trasm</i><par n="m/ette__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="permette"><i>perm</i><par n="m/ette__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="circà"><i>circ</i><par n="circ/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="classificà"><i>classific</i><par n="circ/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arricà"><i>arric</i><par n="circ/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="significà"><i>signific</i><par n="circ/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="didicà"><i>didic</i><par n="circ/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ricircà"><i>ricirc</i><par n="circ/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="indic"><i>indic</i><par n="circ/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vindic"><i>vindic</i><par n="circ/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rivindic"><i>rivindic</i><par n="circ/à__vblex"/></e>
